Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202679-1338
K-12 Education Cybersecurity Act, how cited.

Sections 79-1338 to 79-1343 shall be known and may be cited as the K-12 Education Cybersecurity Act.

Laws 2026, LB937, § 26.
July 18, 2026